Montana, session 2025, HB422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 70-17-203, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-17-203. Covenants that run with land. (1) Except as provided in 70-1-522 and 70-17-212, every
covenant contained in a grant of an estate in real property that is made for the direct benefit of the property or
some part of the property then in existence runs with the land.
(2) Subsection (1) includes:
(a) covenants of warranty, for quiet enjoyment, or for further assurance on the part of the grantor
and covenants for the payment of rent or of taxes or assessments upon the land on the part of a grantee;
(b) conservation easements pursuant to 76-6-209;
(c) a dedication of open space as provided in 76-3-509; and
(d) wind easements pursuant to Title 70, chapter 17, part 4; and
(e) covenants restricting the sale, lease, or the owner's share of appreciation in equity of
residential property to individuals with specific incomes or occupations, the purpose of which is to encourage
the long-term affordability and attainability of workforce housing.
(3) A covenant for the addition of some new thing to real property or for the direct benefit of some
part of the property not then in existence or annexed to the property, when contained in a grant of an estate in
the property and made by the covenantor expressly for the covenantor's assigns or to the assigns of the
covenantee, runs with the land so far as the assigns mentioned are concerned."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 422